Massachusetts, session 194th, H4047.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 11 of chapter 40A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 3 to 7, inclusive, the words “two
successive weeks, the first publication to be not less than fourteen days before the day of the
hearing and by posting such notice in a conspicuous place in the city or town hall for a period of
not less than fourteen days before the day of such hearing” and inserting in place thereof the
following words:- 4 successive weeks, the first publication to be not less than 30 days before the
day of the hearing, by posting such notice in a conspicuous place in the city or town hall for a
period of not less than 30 days before the day of such hearing and by posting such notice on the
city or town’s website for a period of not less than 30 days before the day of such hearing.
SECTION 2. Said section 11 of said chapter 40A, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by inserting, in line 16, after the word “town” the following words:- ; provided, that,
for the purposes of judicial review pursuant to section 17, “parties in interest” shall include non-
abutters who demonstrate that: (i) the use for which the permit or special permit was granted
of 2

violates or is likely to violate a municipal nuisance, environment or other quality-of-life
ordinance; and (ii) either: (1) the violation of the municipal ordinance aggrieves a substantial
number of non-abutters; or (2) the decision of the special permit granting or permit granting
authority was procedurally flawed.
SECTION 3. Said section 11 of said chapter 40A, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by striking out, in lines 27 to 29, inclusive, the words “street address, if any, or other
adequate identification of the location, of the area or premises which is the subject of the
petition” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- a map of the area or premises
which is the subject of the petition including the names and street addresses of all abutters.
SECTION 4. Said chapter 40A is hereby further amended by inserting after section 11
the following section:-
Section 11A. (a) Prior to filing an appeal in court pursuant to section 17, non-abutters
qualifying as parties in interest pursuant to section 11 may submit to the special permit granting
or permit granting authority or the board of appeals a written demand for relief, reasonably
describing the permit decision at issue, the municipal ordinance being violated, the grievance
being caused by the violation, the persons being aggrieved, any procedural flaws in the
authority’s decision and the relief sought.
(b) The special permit granting or permit granting authority or the board of appeals shall
review a written demand for relief received pursuant to subsection (a) and make a reply to the
non-abutters notifying them of its final decision on the matter.
of 2